Ohio, session 136, HB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3313.60, 3314.03, 3326.11, and 5
3328.24 be amended and sections 3301.0717 and 3313.6031 of the 6
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 3301.0717. (A) Not later than January 1, 2026, the 8
department of education and workforce shall develop a model 9
success sequence and character education curriculum for 10
developmentally appropriate instruction for grades seven through 11
twelve. The model curriculum shall consist of the value of 12
finishing high school, working full-time, getting married before 13
having children, and instruction in the following character 14
traits and fundamental values deeply rooted in the history and 15
tradition of the United States: 16
(1) Trustworthiness, including honesty, reliability, 17
punctuality, and loyalty; 18

H. B. No. 269 Page 2
As Introduced
(2) Responsibility, including hard work, accountability, 19
diligence, good judgment, perseverance, and self-control; 20
(3) Care for family, including parents, siblings, and 21
future spouses and children; 22
(4) Kindness and generosity toward others; 23
(5) Respect and care for human life; 24
(6) Respect for parental authority; 25
(7) Respect for parents' obligations to children; 26
(8) Respect for the property of other people; 27
(9) Respect for legitimate authority and law; 28
(10) Respect for patriotism, service to the community, and 29
concern for the common good; 30
(11) Respect for religious faith, morality, wisdom, and 31
knowledge; 32
(12) Respect for lifelong marriage, sexual fidelity within 33
marriage, and sexual abstinence outside of marriage; 34
(13) Gratitude; 35
(14) Charity; 36
(15) Courage. 37
(B) The department shall approve each district's success 38
sequence and character education curriculum adopted under 39
section 3301.60 of the Revised Code and establish a protocol to 40
be used by districts to provide continuity in teaching the 41
approved curriculum in a manner that is age, grade, and 42
developmentally appropriate. 43

H. B. No. 269 Page 3
As Introduced
(C) The department shall maintain a list of success 44
sequence and character education curricula implemented by school 45
districts. 46
(D) The department shall report annually to the governor, 47
lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, 48
and chairpersons of the committees of the senate and house of 49
representatives that primarily deal with education both of the 50
following: 51
(1) Based on data reported by districts, the impact of 52
success sequence and character education curricula on student 53
discipline and academic achievement; 54
(2) Other reported data relating to success sequence and 55
character education curricula the department considers 56
appropriate for inclusion. 57
The report shall be made available to the public in a 58
clearly accessible manner on the department's web site. 59
(E) The department may accept federal or private funds for 60
the purpose of assisting school districts in implementing 61
success sequence and character education curricula. 62
(F) The department may adopt rules as necessary to 63
implement this section. 64
Sec. 3313.60. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 65
3311.52 of the Revised Code, divisions (A) to (E) of this 66
section do not apply to any cooperative education school 67
district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of section 68
3311.52 of the Revised Code. 69
(A) The board of education of each city, exempted village, 70
and local school district and the board of each cooperative 71

H. B. No. 269 Page 4
As Introduced
education school district established, pursuant to section 72
3311.521 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe a curriculum for 73
all schools under its control. Except as provided in division 74
(E) of this section, in any such curriculum there shall be 75
included the study of the following subjects: 76
(1) The language arts, including reading, writing, 77
spelling, oral and written English, and literature; 78
(2) Geography, the history of the United States and of 79
Ohio, and national, state, and local government in the United 80
States, including a balanced presentation of the relevant 81
contributions to society of men and women of African, Mexican, 82
Puerto Rican, and American Indian descent as well as other 83
ethnic and racial groups in Ohio and the United States; 84
(3) Mathematics; 85
(4) Natural science, including instruction in the 86
conservation of natural resources; 87
(5) Health education, which shall include instruction in: 88
(a) The nutritive value of foods, including natural and 89
organically produced foods, the relation of nutrition to health, 90
and the use and effects of food additives; 91
(b) The harmful effects of and legal restrictions against 92
the use of drugs of abuse, alcoholic beverages, and tobacco, 93
including electronic smoking devices; 94
(c) Sexually transmitted infection education, except that 95
upon written request of the student's parent or guardian, a 96
student shall be excused from taking instruction in sexually 97
transmitted infection education; 98
(d) In grades kindergarten through six, annual 99

H. B. No. 269 Page 5
As Introduced
developmentally appropriate instruction in child sexual abuse 100
prevention, including information on available counseling and 101
resources for children who are sexually abused. Such instruction 102
and information provided shall not be connected in any way to 103
any individual, entity, or organization that provides, promotes, 104
counsels, or makes referrals for abortion or abortion-related 105
services. Upon written request of the student's parent or 106
guardian, a student shall be excused from taking instruction in 107
child sexual abuse prevention. 108
(e) In grades kindergarten through six, instruction in 109
personal safety and assault prevention, except that upon written 110
request of the student's parent or guardian, a student shall be 111
excused from taking instruction in personal safety and assault 112
prevention; 113
(f) In grades seven through twelve, developmentally 114
appropriate instruction in dating violence prevention education 115
and sexual violence prevention education, which shall include 116
instruction in recognizing dating violence warning signs and 117
characteristics of healthy relationships, except that upon 118
written request of the student's parent or guardian a student 119
shall be excused from taking instruction in sexual violence 120
prevention. 121
In order to assist school districts in developing a dating 122
violence prevention education and sexual violence prevention 123
education curriculum, the department of education and workforce 124
shall provide on its web site links to free curricula addressing 125
dating violence prevention and sexual violence prevention 126
education. Such instruction and information shall not be 127
connected in any way to any individual, entity, or organization 128
that provides, promotes, counsels, or makes referrals for 129

H. B. No. 269 Page 6
As Introduced
abortion or abortion-related services. 130
Each school district shall notify the parents and legal 131
guardians of students who receive instruction related to child 132
sexual abuse prevention and sexual violence prevention, as 133
described under divisions (A)(5)(d) and (f) of this section, of 134
all of the following: 135
(i) That instruction in child sexual abuse prevention and 136
sexual violence prevention is a required part of the district's 137
curriculum; 138
(ii) That upon request, parents and legal guardians may 139
examine such instructional materials in accordance with this 140
section; 141
(iii) That upon written request of the student's parent or 142
guardian, a student shall be excused from taking instruction in 143
child sexual abuse prevention and sexual violence prevention. 144
If the parent or legal guardian of a student less than 145
eighteen years of age submits to the principal of the student's 146
school a written request to examine the dating violence 147
prevention and sexual violence prevention instruction materials 148
used at that school, the principal, within forty-eight hours 149
after the request is made, shall allow the parent or guardian to 150
examine those materials at that school. 151
(g) Prescription opioid abuse prevention, with an emphasis 152
on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection between 153
prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as 154
heroin; 155
(h) The process of making an anatomical gift under Chapter 156
2108. of the Revised Code, with an emphasis on the life-saving 157
and life-enhancing effects of organ and tissue donation; 158

H. B. No. 269 Page 7
As Introduced
(i) Beginning with the first day of the next school year 159
that begins at least two years after March 24, 2021, in grades 160
six through twelve, at least one hour or one standard class 161
period per school year of evidence-based suicide awareness and 162
prevention and at least one hour or one standard class period 163
per school year of safety training and violence prevention, 164
except that upon written request of the student's parent or 165
guardian, a student shall be excused from taking instruction in 166
suicide awareness and prevention or safety training and violence 167
prevention; 168
(j) Beginning with the first day of the next school year 169
that begins at least two years after March 24, 2021, in grades 170
six through twelve, at least one hour or one standard class 171
period per school year of evidence-based social inclusion 172
instruction, except that upon written request of the student's 173
parent or guardian, a student shall be excused from taking 174
instruction in social inclusion. 175
For the instruction required under divisions (A)(5)(i) and 176
(j) of this section, the board shall use a training program 177
approved by the department of education and workforce under 178
section 3301.221 of the Revised Code. 179
Schools may use student assemblies, digital learning, and 180
homework to satisfy the instruction requirements under divisions 181
(A)(5)(i) and (j) of this section. 182
(6) Physical education; 183
(7) The fine arts, including music; 184
(8) First aid, including a training program in 185
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, which shall comply with section 186
3313.6021 of the Revised Code when offered in any of grades nine 187

H. B. No. 269 Page 8
As Introduced
through twelve, safety, and fire prevention. However, upon 188
written request of the student's parent or guardian, a student 189
shall be excused from taking instruction in cardiopulmonary 190
resuscitation. 191
(9) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, in grades 192
seven through twelve, developmentally appropriate instruction in 193
success sequence and character education. Each board shall 194
develop a success sequence and character education curriculum 195
and may adopt the model curriculum developed by the department 196
under section 3301.0717 of the Revised Code. 197
In developing a success sequence and character education 198
curriculum, the board shall consult with a committee selected by 199
the school district consisting of each of the following: 200
(a) Parents of students enrolled in the district; 201
(b) Educators with experience in teaching character 202
education and content deeply rooted in United States history and 203
tradition; 204
(c) Other members of the community, including community 205
leaders with specific knowledge of fundamental values deeply 206
rooted in United States history and tradition. 207
The board shall submit its success sequence and character 208
education curriculum to the department for approval under 209
division (B) of section 3301.0717 of the Revised Code. 210
(B) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, 211
every school or school district shall include in the 212
requirements for promotion from the eighth grade to the ninth 213
grade one year's course of study of American history. A board 214
may waive this requirement for academically accelerated students 215
who, in accordance with procedures adopted by the board, are 216

H. B. No. 269 Page 9
As Introduced
able to demonstrate mastery of essential concepts and skills of 217
the eighth grade American history course of study. 218
(C) As specified in divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of section 219
3313.603 of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (E) 220
of this section, every high school shall include in the 221
requirements for graduation from any curriculum one-half unit 222
each of American history and government. 223
(D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, 224
basic instruction or demonstrated mastery in geography, United 225
States history, the government of the United States, the 226
government of the state of Ohio, local government in Ohio, the 227
Declaration of Independence, the United States Constitution, and 228
the Constitution of the state of Ohio shall be required before 229
pupils may participate in courses involving the study of social 230
problems, economics, foreign affairs, United Nations, world 231
government, socialism, and communism. 232
(E) For each cooperative education school district 233
established pursuant to section 3311.521 of the Revised Code and 234
each city, exempted village, and local school district that has 235
territory within such a cooperative district, the curriculum 236
adopted pursuant to divisions (A) to (D) of this section shall 237
only include the study of the subjects that apply to the grades 238
operated by each such school district. The curricula for such 239
schools, when combined, shall provide to each student of these 240
districts all of the subjects required under divisions (A) to 241
(D) of this section. 242
(F) The board of education of any cooperative education 243
school district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of 244
section 3311.52 of the Revised Code shall prescribe a curriculum 245
for the subject areas and grade levels offered in any school 246

H. B. No. 269 Page 10
As Introduced
under its control. 247
(G) Upon the request of any parent or legal guardian of a 248
student, the board of education of any school district shall 249
permit the parent or guardian to promptly examine, with respect 250
to the parent's or guardian's own child: 251
(1) Any survey or questionnaire, prior to its 252
administration to the child; 253
(2) Any textbook, workbook, software, video, or other 254
instructional materials being used by the district in connection 255
with the instruction of the child; 256
(3) Any completed and graded test taken or survey or 257
questionnaire filled out by the child; 258
(4) Copies of the statewide academic standards and each 259
model curriculum developed pursuant to section 3301.079 of the 260
Revised Code, which copies shall be available at all times 261
during school hours in each district school building. 262
Sec. 3313.6031. (A) The board of education of a school 263
district may adopt a policy to make the school premises 264
available for after-school instruction programs provided by 265
third parties that instruct pupils in the justifications for the 266
success sequence and character education curriculum established 267
under section 3301.0717 of the Revised Code. Instruction may 268
consist of any philosophical, historical, traditional, or 269
religious justification for the success sequence and character 270
traits. 271
(B) The board may deny approval to any group that proposes 272
instruction in subject matter that is inconsistent with 273
justification of the success sequence and character traits, but 274
otherwise may not discriminate against any after-school program 275

H. B. No. 269 Page 11
As Introduced
based on its viewpoint. Subject to this division, no board may 276
discriminate against any after-school instruction program on the 277
grounds that it contains religious or political expression. 278
(C) A student may participate in an after-school program 279
established under this section upon consent of the student's 280
parent or guardian. Participation in the program may be 281
terminated by the student or the student's parent or guardian at 282
any time upon notice to the board. No student shall be required 283
to participate in an after-school program established under this 284
section. 285
(D) A board that adopts a policy under this section shall 286
make a list of approved after-school programs available to 287
parents and adopt a process, in cooperation with the third-party 288
providers, to obtain the consent of the student and the 289
student's parent or guardian for the student's participation. 290
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 291
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 292
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 293
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 294
contract filed with the director under this section. 295
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 296
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 297
following: 298
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 299
following: 300
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 301
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 302
2003; 303
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 304

H. B. No. 269 Page 12
As Introduced
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 305
(2) The education program of the school, including the 306
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 307
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 308
focus of the curriculum; 309
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 310
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 311
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 312
assessments; 313
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 314
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 315
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 316
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 317
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 318
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 319
Code; 320
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 321
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 322
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 323
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 324
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 325
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 326
student. 327
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 328
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 329
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 330
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 331
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 332

H. B. No. 269 Page 13
As Introduced
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 333
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 334
117.10 of the Revised Code. 335
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 336
to be used that contains at least the following information: 337
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 338
instructional purposes; 339
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 340
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 341
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 342
that are paid by the school; 343
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 344
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 345
operator, if any. 346
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 347
following: 348
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 349
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 350
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 351
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 352
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 353
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 354
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 355
any position. 356
(11) That the school will comply with the following 357
requirements: 358
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 359

H. B. No. 269 Page 14
As Introduced
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 360
twenty hours per school year. 361
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 362
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 363
the school. 364
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 365
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 366
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 367
religious institution. 368
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 369
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 370
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 371
3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 372
3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 373
3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 374
3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 375
3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 376
3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 377
3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 378
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 379
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 380
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 381
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 382
3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 383
3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 384
3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 385
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 386
2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the 387
Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply 388
with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner 389

H. B. No. 269 Page 15
As Introduced
specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. 390
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 391
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 392
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 393
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 394
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 395
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 396
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 397
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 398
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 399
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 400
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 401
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 402
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 403
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 404
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 405
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 406
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 407
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 408
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 409
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 410
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 411
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 412
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 413
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 414
subject area competency adopted by the department under 415
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 416
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 417
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 418
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 419
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 420

H. B. No. 269 Page 16
As Introduced
cooperative education developed by the department under division 421
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 422
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 423
months after the end of each school year a report of its 424
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 425
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 426
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 427
in the school. 428
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 429
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 430
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 431
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 432
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 433
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 434
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 435
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 436
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 437
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 438
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 439
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 440
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 441
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 442
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 443
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 444
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 445
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 446
unless it is either of the following: 447
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 448
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 449

H. B. No. 269 Page 17
As Introduced
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 450
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 451
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 452
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 453
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 454
Revised Code. 455
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 456
to employees; 457
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 458
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 459
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 460
(E) of this section. 461
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 462
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 463
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 464
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 465
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 466
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 467
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 468
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 469
Revised Code; 470
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 471
or part of an existing public school or educational service 472
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 473
a converted public school or service center building, 474
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 475
that the board of education or service center governing board 476
that operated the school or building before conversion is 477
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 478

H. B. No. 269 Page 18
As Introduced
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 479
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 480
agreement applicable to such employees; 481
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 482
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 483
governing authority of the community school; 484
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 485
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 486
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 487
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 488
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 489
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 490
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 491
the district in which the school is located; 492
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 493
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 494
located; 495
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 496
other district in the state. 497
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 498
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 499
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 500
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 501
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 502
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 503
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 504
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 505
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 506

H. B. No. 269 Page 19
As Introduced
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 507
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 508
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 509
(b) The authority of the department as the community 510
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 511
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 512
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 513
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 514
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 515
action. 516
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 517
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 518
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 519
with criteria for student participation established by the 520
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 521
Revised Code; 522
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 523
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 524
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 525
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 526
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 527
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 528
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 529
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 530
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 531
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 532
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 533
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 534
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 535

H. B. No. 269 Page 20
As Introduced
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 536
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 537
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 538
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 539
policies will be available for public inspection; 540
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 541
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 542
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 543
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 544
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 545
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 546
the Revised Code; 547
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 548
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 549
of the following information: 550
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 551
will be used; 552
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 553
be determined and documented; 554
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 555
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 556
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 557
the school will document participation in learning 558
opportunities; 559
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 560
monitored; 561
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 562
be protected; 563

H. B. No. 269 Page 21
As Introduced
(g) A description of the professional development 564
activities that will be offered to teachers. 565
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 566
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 567
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 568
interest at a fair market rate; 569
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 570
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 571
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 572
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 573
contracted. 574
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 575
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 576
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 577
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 578
the parent's or student's primary residence. 579
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 580
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 581
students enrolling in or attending the school. 582
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 583
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 584
following: 585
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 586
school will be selected in the future; 587
(2) The management and administration of the school; 588
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 589
school or educational service center building, alternative 590
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 591

H. B. No. 269 Page 22
As Introduced
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 592
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 593
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 594
of the school; 595
(5) Internal financial controls. 596
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 597
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 598
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 599
authority of the school. 600
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 601
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 602
community school may provide for the community school governing 603
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 604
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 605
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 606
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 607
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 608
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 609
receives from the state. 610
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 611
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 612
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 613
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 614
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 615
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 616
contract; 617
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 618
performance and the organization and operation of the community 619
school on at least an annual basis; 620

H. B. No. 269 Page 23
As Introduced
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 621
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 622
contract; 623
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 624
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 625
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 626
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 627
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 628
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 629
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 630
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 631
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 632
closes prior to the end of a school year. 633
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 634
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 635
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 636
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 637
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 638
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 639
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 640
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 641
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 642
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 643
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 644
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 645
within one year after the contract entered into under this 646
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 647
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 648
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 649
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 650

H. B. No. 269 Page 24
As Introduced
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 651
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 652
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 653
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 654
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 655
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 656
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 657
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 658
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 659
3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 660
3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 661
3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 662
3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 663
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 664
3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 665
3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 666
3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 667
3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 668
3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 669
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 670
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 671
3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 672
3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.90, 673
3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 674
3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 675
3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 676
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 677
2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 678
4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 679
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 680
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 681

H. B. No. 269 Page 25
As Introduced
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 682
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 683
3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 684
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 685
3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 686
3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 687
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 688
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 689
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 690
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 691
were a district board of education. 692
Section 2. That existing sections 3313.60, 3314.03, 693
3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 694
Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle 695
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 696
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 697
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 698
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 699
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 700
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 701
as presented in this act: 702
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 703
H.B. 214, H.B. 250, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 704
all of the 135th General Assembly. 705
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 706
H.B. 47, H.B. 214, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 707
all of the 135th General Assembly. 708
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 709
S.B. 208 and S.B. 234 of the 135th General Assembly. 710